test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NID_O_NoExtra_skatig_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     skatig: skatig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     +Px1skatig: niskatig
     +Px2skatig: giskatig
     +Px3skatig: oskatig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     skatig+Dim: skatigens
     skatig+Con: skatigenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     skatig+Pos: skatigim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     skatig+Pej: skatigish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     skatig+Pos1Pl: skatiginaan
     skatig+PosPl: skatigiwaa
     skatig+PosObv: skatigini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     skatig+Pret: skatigiban
     skatig+VocPl: skatig***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     skatig+Obv: skatigan
     skatig+Pl: skatigag
     skatig+Loc: skatiging
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     +Px1skatig+Dim: niskatigens
     +Px1skatig+Con: niskatigenh
     +Px2skatig+Dim: giskatigens
     +Px2skatig+Con: giskatigenh
     +Px3skatig+Dim: oskatigens
     +Px3skatig+Con: oskatigenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     +Px1skatig+Pos: niskatigim
     +Px2skatig+Pos: giskatigim
     +Px3skatig+Pos: oskatigim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     +Px1skatig+Pej: niskatigish
     +Px2skatig+Pej: giskatigish
     +Px3skatig+Pej: oskatigish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     +Px1skatig+Pos1Pl: niskatiginaan
     +Px1skatig+PosPl: niskatigiwaa
     +Px1skatig+PosObv: niskatigini
     +Px2skatig+Pos1Pl: giskatiginaan
     +Px2skatig+PosPl: giskatigiwaa
     +Px2skatig+PosObv: giskatigini
     +Px3skatig+Pos1Pl: oskatiginaan
     +Px3skatig+PosPl: oskatigiwaa
     +Px3skatig+PosObv: oskatigini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     +Px1skatig+Pret: niskatigiban
     +Px1skatig+VocPl: niskatig***idig, idog***
     +Px2skatig+Pret: giskatigiban
     +Px2skatig+VocPl: giskatig***idig, idog***
     +Px3skatig+Pret: oskatigiban
     +Px3skatig+VocPl: oskatig***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     +Px1skatig+Obv: niskatigan
     +Px1skatig+Pl: niskatigag
     +Px1skatig+Loc: niskatiging
     +Px2skatig+Obv: giskatigan
     +Px2skatig+Pl: giskatigag
     +Px2skatig+Loc: giskatiging
     +Px3skatig+Obv: oskatigan
     +Px3skatig+Pl: oskatigag
     +Px3skatig+Loc: oskatiging
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     skatig+Dim+Pos: skatigensim
     skatig+Con+Pos: skatigenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     skatig+Dim+Pej: skatigensish
     skatig+Con+Pej: skatigenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     skatig+Dim+Pos1Pl: skatigensinaan
     skatig+Dim+PosPl: skatigensiwaa
     skatig+Dim+PosObv: skatigensini
     skatig+Con+Pos1Pl: skatigenhinaan
     skatig+Con+PosPl: skatigenhiwaa
     skatig+Con+PosObv: skatigenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     skatig+Dim+Pret: skatigensiban
     skatig+Dim+VocPl: skatigens***idig, idog***
     skatig+Con+Pret: skatigenhiban
     skatig+Con+VocPl: skatigenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     skatig+Dim+Obv: skatigensan
     skatig+Dim+Pl: skatigensag
     skatig+Dim+Loc: skatigensing
     skatig+Con+Obv: skatigenhan
     skatig+Con+Pl: skatigenhag
     skatig+Con+Loc: skatigenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     skatig+Pos+Pej: skatigimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl: skatigiminaan
     skatig+Pos+PosPl: skatigimiwaa
     skatig+Pos+PosObv: skatigimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 6
     skatig+Pos+Pret: skatigimiban
     skatig+Pos+VocPl: skatigim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 7
     skatig+Pos+Obv: skatigiman
     skatig+Pos+Pl: skatigimag
     skatig+Pos+Loc: skatigiming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl: skatigishinaan
     skatig+Pej+PosPl: skatigishiwaa
     skatig+Pej+PosObv: skatigishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     skatig+Pej+Pret: skatigishiban
     skatig+Pej+VocPl: skatigish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     skatig+Pej+Obv: skatigishan
     skatig+Pej+Pl: skatigishag
     skatig+Pej+Loc: skatigishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 6
     skatig+Pos1Pl+Pret: skatiginaaniban
     skatig+Pos1Pl+VocPl: skatiginaan***idig, idog***
     skatig+PosPl+Pret: skatigiwaaiban
     skatig+PosPl+VocPl: skatigiwaa***idig, idog***
     skatig+PosObv+Pret: skatiginiiban
     skatig+PosObv+VocPl: skatigini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 7
     skatig+Pos1Pl+Obv: skatiginaanan
     skatig+Pos1Pl+Pl: skatiginaanag
     skatig+Pos1Pl+Loc: skatiginaaning
     skatig+PosPl+Obv: skatigiwaaan
     skatig+PosPl+Pl: skatigiwaaag
     skatig+PosPl+Loc: skatigiwaaing
     skatig+PosObv+Obv: skatiginian
     skatig+PosObv+Pl: skatiginiag
     skatig+PosObv+Loc: skatiginiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     skatig+Pret+Obv: skatigibanan
     skatig+Pret+Pl: skatigibanag
     skatig+Pret+Loc: skatigibaning
     skatig+VocPl+Obv: skatig***idig, idog***an
     skatig+VocPl+Pl: skatig***idig, idog***ag
     skatig+VocPl+Loc: skatig***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos: niskatigensim
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos: niskatigenhim
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos: giskatigensim
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos: giskatigenhim
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos: oskatigensim
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos: oskatigenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pej: niskatigensish
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pej: niskatigenhish
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pej: giskatigensish
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pej: giskatigenhish
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pej: oskatigensish
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pej: oskatigenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos1Pl: niskatigensinaan
     +Px1skatig+Dim+PosPl: niskatigensiwaa
     +Px1skatig+Dim+PosObv: niskatigensini
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos1Pl: niskatigenhinaan
     +Px1skatig+Con+PosPl: niskatigenhiwaa
     +Px1skatig+Con+PosObv: niskatigenhini
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos1Pl: giskatigensinaan
     +Px2skatig+Dim+PosPl: giskatigensiwaa
     +Px2skatig+Dim+PosObv: giskatigensini
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos1Pl: giskatigenhinaan
     +Px2skatig+Con+PosPl: giskatigenhiwaa
     +Px2skatig+Con+PosObv: giskatigenhini
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos1Pl: oskatigensinaan
     +Px3skatig+Dim+PosPl: oskatigensiwaa
     +Px3skatig+Dim+PosObv: oskatigensini
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos1Pl: oskatigenhinaan
     +Px3skatig+Con+PosPl: oskatigenhiwaa
     +Px3skatig+Con+PosObv: oskatigenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pret: niskatigensiban
     +Px1skatig+Dim+VocPl: niskatigens***idig, idog***
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pret: niskatigenhiban
     +Px1skatig+Con+VocPl: niskatigenh***idig, idog***
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pret: giskatigensiban
     +Px2skatig+Dim+VocPl: giskatigens***idig, idog***
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pret: giskatigenhiban
     +Px2skatig+Con+VocPl: giskatigenh***idig, idog***
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pret: oskatigensiban
     +Px3skatig+Dim+VocPl: oskatigens***idig, idog***
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pret: oskatigenhiban
     +Px3skatig+Con+VocPl: oskatigenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Obv: niskatigensan
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pl: niskatigensag
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Loc: niskatigensing
     +Px1skatig+Con+Obv: niskatigenhan
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pl: niskatigenhag
     +Px1skatig+Con+Loc: niskatigenhing
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Obv: giskatigensan
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pl: giskatigensag
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Loc: giskatigensing
     +Px2skatig+Con+Obv: giskatigenhan
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pl: giskatigenhag
     +Px2skatig+Con+Loc: giskatigenhing
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Obv: oskatigensan
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pl: oskatigensag
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Loc: oskatigensing
     +Px3skatig+Con+Obv: oskatigenhan
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pl: oskatigenhag
     +Px3skatig+Con+Loc: oskatigenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     +Px1skatig+Pos+Pej: niskatigimish
     +Px2skatig+Pos+Pej: giskatigimish
     +Px3skatig+Pos+Pej: oskatigimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     +Px1skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl: niskatigiminaan
     +Px1skatig+Pos+PosPl: niskatigimiwaa
     +Px1skatig+Pos+PosObv: niskatigimini
     +Px2skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl: giskatigiminaan
     +Px2skatig+Pos+PosPl: giskatigimiwaa
     +Px2skatig+Pos+PosObv: giskatigimini
     +Px3skatig+Pos+Pos1Pl: oskatigiminaan
     +Px3skatig+Pos+PosPl: oskatigimiwaa
     +Px3skatig+Pos+PosObv: oskatigimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     +Px1skatig+Pos+Pret: niskatigimiban
     +Px1skatig+Pos+VocPl: niskatigim***idig, idog***
     +Px2skatig+Pos+Pret: giskatigimiban
     +Px2skatig+Pos+VocPl: giskatigim***idig, idog***
     +Px3skatig+Pos+Pret: oskatigimiban
     +Px3skatig+Pos+VocPl: oskatigim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     +Px1skatig+Pos+Obv: niskatigiman
     +Px1skatig+Pos+Pl: niskatigimag
     +Px1skatig+Pos+Loc: niskatigiming
     +Px2skatig+Pos+Obv: giskatigiman
     +Px2skatig+Pos+Pl: giskatigimag
     +Px2skatig+Pos+Loc: giskatigiming
     +Px3skatig+Pos+Obv: oskatigiman
     +Px3skatig+Pos+Pl: oskatigimag
     +Px3skatig+Pos+Loc: oskatigiming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     +Px1skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl: niskatigishinaan
     +Px1skatig+Pej+PosPl: niskatigishiwaa
     +Px1skatig+Pej+PosObv: niskatigishini
     +Px2skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl: giskatigishinaan
     +Px2skatig+Pej+PosPl: giskatigishiwaa
     +Px2skatig+Pej+PosObv: giskatigishini
     +Px3skatig+Pej+Pos1Pl: oskatigishinaan
     +Px3skatig+Pej+PosPl: oskatigishiwaa
     +Px3skatig+Pej+PosObv: oskatigishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     +Px1skatig+Pej+Pret: niskatigishiban
     +Px1skatig+Pej+VocPl: niskatigish***idig, idog***
     +Px2skatig+Pej+Pret: giskatigishiban
     +Px2skatig+Pej+VocPl: giskatigish***idig, idog***
     +Px3skatig+Pej+Pret: oskatigishiban
     +Px3skatig+Pej+VocPl: oskatigish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     +Px1skatig+Pej+Obv: niskatigishan
     +Px1skatig+Pej+Pl: niskatigishag
     +Px1skatig+Pej+Loc: niskatigishing
     +Px2skatig+Pej+Obv: giskatigishan
     +Px2skatig+Pej+Pl: giskatigishag
     +Px2skatig+Pej+Loc: giskatigishing
     +Px3skatig+Pej+Obv: oskatigishan
     +Px3skatig+Pej+Pl: oskatigishag
     +Px3skatig+Pej+Loc: oskatigishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     +Px1skatig+Pos1Pl+Pret: niskatiginaaniban
     +Px1skatig+Pos1Pl+VocPl: niskatiginaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1skatig+PosPl+Pret: niskatigiwaaiban
     +Px1skatig+PosPl+VocPl: niskatigiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1skatig+PosObv+Pret: niskatiginiiban
     +Px1skatig+PosObv+VocPl: niskatigini***idig, idog***
     +Px2skatig+Pos1Pl+Pret: giskatiginaaniban
     +Px2skatig+Pos1Pl+VocPl: giskatiginaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2skatig+PosPl+Pret: giskatigiwaaiban
     +Px2skatig+PosPl+VocPl: giskatigiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2skatig+PosObv+Pret: giskatiginiiban
     +Px2skatig+PosObv+VocPl: giskatigini***idig, idog***
     +Px3skatig+Pos1Pl+Pret: oskatiginaaniban
     +Px3skatig+Pos1Pl+VocPl: oskatiginaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3skatig+PosPl+Pret: oskatigiwaaiban
     +Px3skatig+PosPl+VocPl: oskatigiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px3skatig+PosObv+Pret: oskatiginiiban
     +Px3skatig+PosObv+VocPl: oskatigini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     +Px1skatig+Pos1Pl+Obv: niskatiginaanan
     +Px1skatig+Pos1Pl+Pl: niskatiginaanag
     +Px1skatig+Pos1Pl+Loc: niskatiginaaning
     +Px1skatig+PosPl+Obv: niskatigiwaaan
     +Px1skatig+PosPl+Pl: niskatigiwaaag
     +Px1skatig+PosPl+Loc: niskatigiwaaing
     +Px1skatig+PosObv+Obv: niskatiginian
     +Px1skatig+PosObv+Pl: niskatiginiag
     +Px1skatig+PosObv+Loc: niskatiginiing
     +Px2skatig+Pos1Pl+Obv: giskatiginaanan
     +Px2skatig+Pos1Pl+Pl: giskatiginaanag
     +Px2skatig+Pos1Pl+Loc: giskatiginaaning
     +Px2skatig+PosPl+Obv: giskatigiwaaan
